New York, session 2025-2026, S1889.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state law is amended by adding a new section 93 to read 2 as follows: 3 § 93. Purple Heart state. The state of New York is designated a 4 "purple heart state", honoring our combat veterans for their service and 5 sacrifice. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 7 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 8 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 9 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 10 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00327-01-5